apertium-ga-gd/apertium-ga-gd.ga-full.dix
    <pardef n="plé/asc__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ascadh</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ascadh</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ascadh</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ascaidís</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ascaigí</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ascaimid</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ascaim</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ascaimis</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ascaim</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ascanna</l>
          <r>asc<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ascanna</l>
          <r>asc<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ascann</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ascann</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ascann</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ascann</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asc</l>
          <r>asc<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ascfaidh</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ascfaidh</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ascfaidh</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ascfaidh</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ascfaidh</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ascfaimid</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ascfar</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asc</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asctar</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asctha</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asctha</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asctha</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asctha</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>asctha</l>
          <r>asc<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>isce</l>
          <r>asc<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ainm__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>neacha</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>neacha</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="uilelo/scadh__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iscthe</l>
          <r>scadh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iscthí</l>
          <r>scadh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iscthí</l>
          <r>scadh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>scadh</l>
          <r>scadh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="má/thair__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ithreacha</l>
          <r>thair<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ithreacha</l>
          <r>thair<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>thair</l>
          <r>thair<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>thar</l>
          <r>thair<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mórmh/uir__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ara</l>
          <r>uir<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uir</l>
          <r>uir<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ina__pr">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><a/>i<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ina</l>
          <r>i<s n="pr"/><j/>a<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ina</l>
          <r>i<s n="pr"/><j/>a<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ina</l>
          <r>i<s n="pr"/><j/>a<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>inár</l>
          <r>i<s n="pr"/><j/>ár<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="ina"><i/><par n="ina__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="comhainm"><par n="initial-c"/><i>omhainm</i><par n="ainm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ainm"><par n="initial-a"/><i>inm</i><par n="ainm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="acrainm"><par n="initial-a"/><i>crainm</i><par n="ainm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="comhadainm"><par n="initial-c"/><i>omhadainm</i><par n="ainm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="áitainm"><par n="initial-á"/><i>itainm</i><par n="ainm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bunainm"><par n="initial-b"/><i>unainm</i><par n="ainm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forainm"><par n="initial-f"/><i>orainm</i><par n="ainm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mórmhuir"><par n="initial-m"/><i>órmh</i><par n="mórmh/uir__n"/></e>
    <e lm="máthair"><par n="initial-m"/><i>á</i><par n="má/thair__n"/></e>
    <e lm="logainm"><i>logainm</i><par n="ainm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leasainm"><i>leasainm</i><par n="ainm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pléasc"><par n="initial-p"/><i>lé</i><par n="plé/asc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="óstainm"><par n="initial-ó"/><i>stainm</i><par n="ainm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ríonmháthair"><i>ríonmhá</i><par n="má/thair__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uileloscadh"><par n="initial-u"/><i>ilelo</i><par n="uilelo/scadh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sráidainm"><par n="initial-s"/><i>ráidainm</i><par n="ainm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trádainm"><par n="initial-t"/><i>rádainm</i><par n="ainm__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Meánmhuir"><i>Meánmh</i><par n="mórmh/uir__n"/></e>
